Wyoming statutes. Title 22 Elections
Article 3. School or Community College Election Procedure

§ 22-22-301.
“District” defined.

As used in this article including W.S.

22-22-301

through 22-22-308, inclusive, the term “district” refers to a community college district board or a school district board of trustees.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 251, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 22.1-302.

Cross references. —

As to partitioning community college district into election subdistricts, see §

21-18-308

.

As to community college district annexation elections, see §

21-18-310

.

As to community college district formation elections, see §

21-18-312

.

§ 22-22-302.
Conduct of elections.

Unless specifically otherwise provided, a school or community college district election shall be governed by the laws regulating statewide elections and in even-numbered years be conducted and canvassed by the same election officials, using the same poll lists, and at the same times and polling places, as county elections.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 251, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 22.1-303.

Cross references. —

For time of county elections, see §§

22-2-104

and

22-2-105

.

§ 22-22-303.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 1998, ch. 100, § 5.

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from Laws 1973, ch. 251, § 1, provided that the county clerk was to provide sufficient supplies to polling places.

§ 22-22-304.
Ballot information; format.

The official ballot shall contain the following information:

The name of the school district or community college district;

The county or counties in which the district is located;

The number of offices to be filled, the length of term for each office, and the number and names of candidates for each office for whom each voter is entitled to vote;

In districts divided into trustee residence areas or subdistricts, the trustee residence area or subdistrict of each candidate and the number to be elected from each trustee residence area or subdistrict;

Ballot propositions to be voted on at the election.

Repealed by Laws 1998, ch. 100, § 5.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 251, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 22.1-306; Laws 1998, ch. 100, § 5.

§§ 22-22-305 through 22-22-308.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 1998, ch. 100, § 5.

Editor's notes. —

These sections, which derived from Laws 1973, ch. 251, § 1, related to certification of results, the breaking of tie votes, and disposition of ballots.